Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3765.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; FAITH'S LAW "SAVE A LIFE" SAFETY PROGRAM.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sum indicated in this section is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of education for the fiscal year designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Smart monitored public access safety cabinets on school grounds. new text end new text begin (a) For a grant to the Minnesota State High School League for school districts to purchase, install, and operate smart monitored public access safety cabinets on school grounds: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 6,500,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) Grant money must be used to purchase and install up to 1,400 smart monitored public access safety cabinets, at a cost of $4,500 per unit. The smart monitored safety cabinets include fully connected automated external defibrillator (AED) units with quick rescue that is integrated into 911 call centers, an American Heart Association kit to stop bleeding, naloxone, four years of AED smart monitoring and full maintenance, and miscellaneous accessories and actions in an AED package program supplied by Power to Save a Life, Advocates for Health, AED Smart Monitoring LLC, Avive Real Connect AED, or their equivalents. The AED units must be installed on school grounds, and must comply with public access AED requirements in accordance with Minnesota Statutes, section 403.51. new text end new text begin (c) The Minnesota State High School League must administer the grant program in conjunction with the Department of Education. The Minnesota State High School League must select school districts, charter schools, or Tribal contract schools as grant award recipients from applicants that agree to the following: new text end new text begin (1) each AED unit purchased with grant money must be located outdoors or in an indoor facility that is always publicly accessible; new text end new text begin (2) the local, state, or federal agency that administers the land on which the AED unit is located must agree to the specific location where it is placed; new text end new text begin (3) the grant recipient must provide for the operation and maintenance of the AED unit for four years from installation without seeking additional state or local funding; new text end new text begin (4) the grant recipient must install, operate, and maintain the AED unit in a manner that accounts for typical weather and temperature conditions and ensures reliable operation in those conditions; and new text end new text begin (5) the grant recipient is responsible for compliance with the applicable requirements of Minnesota Statutes, section 403.51. new text end new text begin (d) Each year for the four year availability of the appropriation, $50,000 is available for the Minnesota State High School League to administer the grant. The Minnesota State High School League must coordinate with school districts, charter schools, and Tribal contract schools to seek sponsorships, additional public or nonpublic funds, or in-kind contributions. new text end new text begin (e) By October 1, 2026, the Minnesota State High School League must begin accepting school district applications for installation of smart monitored public access safety cabinets on school grounds and determine the per district allocation of grant money. new text end new text begin (f) By October 1, 2027, the Minnesota State High School League must report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees having jurisdiction over kindergarten through grade 12 education on the grants awarded to school districts, money allocated to each recipient district, and number of AED units installed. The report must be filed in accordance with Minnesota Statutes, section 3.195. new text end new text begin (g) This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2030. new text end